lexicons/verb_rules.lexc
LEXICON V-TV-PROG

! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-AOR

@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>тык END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@ END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гым END ;

@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@D.VPR@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@D.VPR@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>мык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.t@ END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myt@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>ткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@н END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.ne@ END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<aor%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<aor%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>ткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<aor%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<aor%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{Æ%}т END ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-FUT

@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@%>тык END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@D.VPR@ END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гым END ;

@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@D.VPR@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@D.VPR@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>мык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>мык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>гыт END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.t@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myt@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>тык END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.t@ END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myt@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@ END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>ткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@D.VPR@%>н END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.ne@ END ;

@R.VPR.t@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.t@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myt@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myt@%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>ткы END ;
@D.VPR@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@D.VPR@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<fut%>%[%+fut%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{Æ%}т END ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-INTN

@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@ END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.q@тык END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@ END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.yn@гым END ;

@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.q@ END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.q@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>мык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>мык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>гыт END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>тык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@ END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@ END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@ END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>ткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>н END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.yn@ END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<intn%>%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<intn%>%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.q@%<intn%>%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.q@%>ткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<intn%>%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<intn%>%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{Æ%}т END ;


! LEXICON V-TV-PROG-COND

@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@ END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg1%>%[%+inv2%]:@R.VPR.n@ END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg1%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{ы%}гым END ;

@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.n@ END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl1%>%[%+inv%]:@R.VPR.n@%>тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl1%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}мык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}гыт END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;
@R.VPR.yn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl2%>:@R.VPR.yn@%>%{ы%}тык END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.m@ END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.myn@ END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@ END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>ткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>н END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_sg3%>:@R.VPR.ne@ END ;

@R.VPR.m@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.m@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.myn@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl1%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.myn@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl2%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>ткы END ;
@R.VPR.n@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_sg3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.n@%>н%{Æ%}т END ;
@R.VPR.ne@%<cond%>%[%+cond%]%<a_pl3%>%<o_pl3%>:@R.VPR.ne@%>%{Æ%}т END ;


LEXICON END

: END ;
